lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_g-w-ghw.txt
!=========================================
LEXICON NounInflII
!  for noun roots that end in -g, -w, -ghw
!=========================================

!--------------------------------------|
!             ABSOLUTIVE               |
!--------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^0                 PostInflII; ^[Abs.Pl]:^et                  PostInflII; ^[Abs.Du]:^ek             PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ka PostInflII; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^enka        PostInflII; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^egka   PostInflII;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^put       PostInflII; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}put  PostInflII; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^egput  PostInflII;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^pung      PostInflII; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}pung PostInflII; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^egpung PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^en        PostInflII; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten         PostInflII; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^egken  PostInflII;
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^si        PostInflII; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}si   PostInflII; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^egsi   PostInflII;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^tek       PostInflII; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek  PostInflII; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^egtek  PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^a         PostInflII; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^i           PostInflII; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^kek    PostInflII;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^at        PostInflII; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^it          PostInflII; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^egket  PostInflII;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^ak        PostInflII; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^ik          PostInflII; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^egkek  PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ni PostInflII; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}ni   PostInflII; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^egni   PostInflII;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^teng      PostInflII; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}teng PostInflII; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^egteng PostInflII;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^tek       PostInflII; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek  PostInflII; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^egtek  PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|

!------------------------------------------|
!      RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)      |
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^em                    PostInflII; ^[Rel.Pl]:^et                    PostInflII; ^[Rel.Du]:^ek               PostInflII;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^ma            PostInflII; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^ma            PostInflII; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^egma     PostInflII;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflII; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflII; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemta   PostInflII;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflII; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflII; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtung PostInflII;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflII; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflII; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpek    PostInflII;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflII; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflII; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesi   PostInflII;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflII; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflII; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetek  PostInflII;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^an            PostInflII; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^an            PostInflII; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkenka  PostInflII;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^ita           PostInflII; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^ita           PostInflII; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^egkenka  PostInflII;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^ita           PostInflII; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^ita           PostInflII; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^egkenka  PostInflII;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mi            PostInflII; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mi            PostInflII; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmi     PostInflII;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meng          PostInflII; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meng          PostInflII; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeng   PostInflII;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^meng          PostInflII; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^meng          PostInflII; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmeng   PostInflII;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------------|
!                ABLATIVE MODALIS                  |
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^meng                      PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^neng                      PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^egneng              PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemneng    PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnneng   PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegneng PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpeneng    PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegneng   PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesineng  PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegneng PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^aneng             PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^aneng             PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkeneng    PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itneng            PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itneng            PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^itneng      PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkeneng          PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itneng            PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^itneng      PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mineng            PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mineng            PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmineng    PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggneng          PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggneng          PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggneng  PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megneng           PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megneng           PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegneng   PostInflII;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megteneng         PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megteneng         PostInflII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegteneng PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
!             LOCATIVE (localis)             |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^mi                      PostInflII; ^[Loc.Pl]:^ni                      PostInflII; ^[Loc.Du]:^egni              PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflII; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflII; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemni    PostInflII;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflII; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflII; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnni   PostInflII;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflII; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflII; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegni PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpeni    PostInflII;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegni   PostInflII;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflII; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflII; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesini  PostInflII;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflII; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflII; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegni PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^ani             PostInflII; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^ani             PostInflII; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkeni    PostInflII;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itni            PostInflII; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itni            PostInflII; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^itni      PostInflII;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkeni          PostInflII; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itni            PostInflII; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^itni      PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mini            PostInflII; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mini            PostInflII; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmini    PostInflII;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggni          PostInflII; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggni          PostInflII; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggni  PostInflII;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megni           PostInflII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megni           PostInflII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegni   PostInflII;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megteni         PostInflII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megteni         PostInflII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegteni PostInflII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------|
!            ALLATIVE (terminalis)            |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^mun                      PostInflII; ^[All.Pl]:^nun                      PostInflII; ^[All.Du]:^egnun              PostInflII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
